Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.808

Categorical eligibility—Child protective, child welfare, or family assessment response services and participation in specialty courts.

(1) The department shall establish and implement policies in the working connections child care program to allow eligibility for families with children who:

(a) In the last six months have:

(i) Received child protective services as defined and used by chapters 26.44 and 74.13 RCW;

(ii) Received child welfare services as defined and used by chapter 74.13 RCW;

(iii) Received services through a family assessment response as defined and used by chapter 26.44 RCW; or

(iv) A parent or guardian participating in a specialty court or therapeutic court or who is a listed victim in a case in a specialty court or therapeutic court;

(b) Have been referred for child care as part of the family's case management as defined by RCW 74.13.020 or as part of the specialty court or therapeutic court's proceedings; and

(c) Are residing with a biological parent or guardian.

(2) Families who are eligible for working connections child care pursuant to this subsection do not have to keep receiving services or keep participating in a specialty court or therapeutic court identified in this subsection to maintain 12-month authorization as defined in RCW 43.216.800 and have no copayment.

[ 2024 c 67 s 5.]